apertium-kaz-kir.kaz.lexc
LEXICON V-PERS-AOR

! As the name indicates, used for -{E}-<aor>
! NOTE that: Алма театрға бара<aor><p3><sg> ма? – Алма в театр идёт?

V-PERS-S1-NO3PERSON ;
%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>м CLIT ;                    ! Dir/LR
%<p3%>%<sg%>:%>д%{I%} CLIT ;
%<p3%>%<sg%>: CLIT-QST-MA ;              ! Dir/LR
%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>д%{I%} CLIT ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>: CLIT-QST-MA ;              ! Dir/LR ;

LEXICON V-PERS-IFI_EVID

V-PERS-S1-NO3PERSON ;
%<p3%>%<sg%>:%>т%{I%} CLIT ;
%<p3%>%<sg%>:%>т%{I%} CLIT ;

LEXICON VOL-ENDINGS

%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>м CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;
%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>ң CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;
%<p3%>%<sg%>:%>с%{I%} CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;
%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>м%{I%}з CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>л%{A%}р%>%{I%}ң CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>с%{I%} CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>л%{A%}р%>%{I%} CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;             ! Dir/LR

%<p2%>%<frm%>%<sg%>:%>ң%{I%}з CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;
%<p2%>%<frm%>%<pl%>:%>л%{A%}р%>%{I%}ң%{I%}з CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;

!!!!!!!   G E R U N D S   I N F L E C T I O N

! This is a somewhat simplified version of N-INFL-COMMON.
! The idea was to avoid overgeneration (I don't think that ger+DAGI would take
! case endings e.g. Same for ger+NIKI). Still, this cont.class might be not
! suitable for all of the gerunds. /IS/

LEXICON GER-CASE-NO_COPULA

CASE-COMMON ;
%<nom%>: CLIT ;
%<abl%>:%>%{D%}%{A%}н CLIT ;
%<loc%>:%>%{D%}%{A%} CLIT ;

LEXICON GER-ATTR/SUBST

%<attr%>: CLIT ;
!%<subst%>: CASE ;
!%<subst%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р CASE ;

LEXICON GER-ABE-ATTR/ADVL/SUBST

!%<attr%>: CLIT ;
%<advl%>: CLIT ;
!%<subst%>: CASE-2 ;
!%<subst%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р CASE-2 ;

LEXICON GER-ABE-ETC          ! Stuff which doesn't appear after possessives

%+сыз%<post%>:%>с%{I%}з GER-ABE-ATTR/ADVL/SUBST ;

LEXICON GER-GENPOSS-ETC      ! Stuff which can appear after possessives too

%<px%>:%>%{N%}ікі%{n%} CLIT ;
%<loc%>:%>%{D%}%{A%}%{G%}%{I%} GER-ATTR/SUBST ;
%<sim%>:%>%{D%}%{A%}й CLIT ;

LEXICON GER-CASE-ETC

GER-CASE-NO_COPULA ;
GER-GENPOSS-ETC ;

LEXICON GER-POSS-REAL

%<px1sg%>:%>%{I%}м GER-CASE-ETC ;
%<px2sg%>:%>%{I%}ң GER-CASE-ETC ;
%<px3sp%>:%>%{S%}%{I%}%{n%} GER-CASE-ETC ;
%<px1pl%>:%>%{I%}м%{I%}з GER-CASE-ETC ;
%<px2pl%>:%>%{I%}ңд%{A%}р GER-CASE-ETC ;

%<px2sg%>%<frm%>:%>%{I%}ң%{I%}з GER-CASE-ETC ;
%<px2pl%>%<frm%>:%>%{I%}ң%{I%}зд%{A%}р GER-CASE-ETC ;

LEXICON GER-INFL

GER-POSS-REAL ;
GER-CASE-ETC ;
%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р GER-POSS-REAL ;
%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р GER-CASE-ETC ;
GER-ABE-ETC ;

!!!!!!!   end of gerunds inflection lexicon

LEXICON V-FINITE-IRREGULAR_NEGATIVE

%<fut%>:%>%{A%}р V-PERS-S1 ;
%<neg%>%<fut%>:%>м%{A%}с V-PERS-S1 ;

LEXICON V-FINITE-REGULAR_NEGATIVE

%<aor%>:%>%{E%} V-PERS-AOR ;
%<past%>:%>%{G%}%{A%}н V-PERS-S1 ;
%<ifi%>:%>%{D%}%{I%} V-PERS-S2 ;
%<ifi_evid%>:%>%{I%}п V-PERS-IFI_EVID ;
%<fut_plan%>:%>%{M%}%{A%}%{K%} V-PERS-S1 ;

LEXICON V-NONFINITE-IRREGULAR_NEGATIVE

! Participles
%<prc_perf%>:%>%{I%}п CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;
%<prc_perf%>:%>%{o%}%{I%}п CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;            ! Dir/LR
%<neg%>%<prc_perf%>:%>%{M%}%{A%}%>%{E%} CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;
%<prc_vol%>:%>%{G%}%{I%} VOL-ENDINGS ;
%<prc_fplan%>:%>%{M%}%{A%}%{K%} CLIT ;
%<prc_fplan%>:%>%{M%}%{A%}%{K%}ш%{I%} CLIT ;           ! Dir/LR
%<prc_plan%>:%>%{G%}%{A%}л%{I%} CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;

! Verbal adverbs
%<gna_perf%>:%>%{I%}п CLIT ;
%<neg%>%<gna_perf%>:%>%{M%}%{A%}%>%{E%} CLIT ;

%<gna_until%>:%>%{G%}%{A%}нш%{A%} CLIT ;
%<gna_after%>:%>%{G%}%{A%}л%{I%} CLIT ;

! Verbal Adjectives
%<gpr_fut%>:%>%{A%}р V-ADJ ;
%<neg%>%<gpr_fut%>:%>%{M%}%{A%}%>%с V-ADJ ;

%<gpr_ppot%>:%>%{A%}р%>л%{I%}к # ;
%<neg%>%<gpr_ppot%>:%>%{M%}%{A%}%>сл%{I%}%{K%} # ;

!%<neg%>%<gpr_pot2%>:%>%{G%}%{I%}с # ; FIXME looks wrong

! Gerunds
%<ger_fut%>:%>%{A%}р GER-POSS-REAL ;
%<neg%>%<ger_fut%>:%>%{M%}%{A%}%>с GER-POSS-REAL ;

%<ger_ppot%>:%>%{A%}р%>л%{I%}к GER-POSS-REAL ;
%<neg%>%<ger_ppot%>:%>%{M%}%{A%}%>сл%{I%}%{K%} GER-POSS-REAL ;

LEXICON V-NONFINITE-REGULAR_NEGATIVE

! Participles
%<prc_impf%>:%>%{E%} CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;
%<prc_cond%>:%>с%{A%} V-PERS-S2 ;

! Verbal adverbs
%<gna_cond%>:%>с%{A%} V-PERS-S2 ;

! Verbal adjectives
%<gpr_past%>:%>%{G%}%{A%}н V-ADJ ;
%<gpr_impf%>:%>%{E%}т%{I%}н V-ADJ ;
%<gpr_pot%>:%>у%>ш%{I%} V-ADJ ;

! Gerunds
%<ger%>:%>у GER-INFL ;
%<ger_past%>:%>%{G%}%{A%}н GER-INFL ;
%<ger_perf%>:%>%{G%}%{A%}н%>%{L%}%{I%}%{K%} GER-INFL ;
%<ger_abs%>:%>у%>ш%{I%}%>%{L%}%{I%}%{K%} GER-INFL ;
%<ger_impf%>:%>%{E%}т%{I%}н GER-POSS-REAL ;

! Imperatives
%<imp%>%<p2%>%<sg%>: CLIT-MODFOC ;
%<imp%>%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>%{I%}ң%>д%{A%}р CLIT-MODFOC ;
%<imp%>%<p2%>%<frm%>%<sg%>:%>%{I%}ң%{I%}з CLIT-MODFOC ;
%<imp%>%<p2%>%<frm%>%<sg%>:%>%{I%}ң CLIT-MODFOC ;     ! Dir/LR FIXME CHECK
%<imp%>%<p2%>%<frm%>%<pl%>:%>%{I%}ң%{I%}з%>д%{A%}р CLIT-MODFOC ;

! Optative/jussive forms
%<opt%>%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>%{A%}й%{I%}н CLIT ;
!%<opt%>%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>%{G%}%{I%}н CLIT ;              ! FIXME check
%<opt%>%<p3%>%<sg%>:%>с%{I%}н CLIT ;
%<opt%>%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>%{A%}й%{I%}%{K%} CLIT ;
!%<opt%>%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>%{G%}%{I%}л%{A%} CLIT ;         ! FIXME check
%<opt%>%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>с%{I%}н CLIT ;

!%<opt%>%<p2%>%<frm%>%<sg%>:%>%{G%}%{I%}л%{A%} CLIT ;  ! FIXME check
!%<opt%>%<p2%>%<frm%>%<pl%>:%>%{G%}%{I%}л%{A%} CLIT ;  ! FIXME check

LEXICON V-COMMON

V-FINITE-REGULAR_NEGATIVE ;
%<neg%>:%>%{M%}%{A%} V-FINITE-REGULAR_NEGATIVE ;

V-FINITE-IRREGULAR_NEGATIVE ;

V-NONFINITE-REGULAR_NEGATIVE ;
%<neg%>:%>%{M%}%{A%} V-NONFINITE-REGULAR_NEGATIVE ;

V-NONFINITE-IRREGULAR_NEGATIVE ;

LEXICON V-DER

%<coop%>:%>%{I%}с V-COMMON ;

LEXICON V-TV-NOPASS

%<v%>%<tv%>: V-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: V-DER ;

LEXICON V-TV-PASS

! e.g. көрін
%<v%>%<tv%>%<pass%>: V-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<pass%>: V-DER;

LEXICON V-TV

%<v%>%<tv%>: V-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: V-DER ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<pass%>:%>%{I%}%{l%} V-COMMON ;

LEXICON V-IV

%<v%>%<iv%>: V-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: V-DER ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!     auxiliary verbs

LEXICON Vinfl-AUX-IMPF

%<vaux%>%<pres%>: V-PERS-S1 ; ! /жүр, жатыр, тұр, отыр/

LEXICON Vinfl-AUX

%<vaux%>: V-COMMON ; ! these four verbs in other tenses and all other aux. verbs

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!     copula

LEXICON Copula

е%<cop%>%<ger_past%>:екен GER-POSS-REAL ;
е%<cop%>%<ger_perf%>:екен%>%{L%}%{I%}к GER-POSS-REAL ;

е%<cop%>%<neg%>:емес V-PERS-S1 ;
е%<cop%>%<past%>:екен V-PERS-S1 ;
е%<cop%>%<neg%>%<past%>:емес% екен V-PERS-S1 ;
е%<cop%>%<ifi%>:е%>%{D%}%{I%} V-PERS-S2 ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!     PRONOUN'S INFLECTION

!!!!!!!   P E R S O N A L

LEXICON PRON-12SG-CASES

%<gen%>:енің CLIT ;
%<dat%>:аған CLIT ;
%<acc%>:ені CLIT ;
%<abl%>:енен CLIT ;
%<loc%>:енде CLIT ;
%<ins%>:енімен CLIT ;
%<px%>:енікі%{n%} CASE ;
%<loc%>:ендегі ATTR/SUBST ;
%<sim%>:ендей CLIT ;
%<adv%>:еніңше CLIT ;

LEXICON PRON-PERS-INFL

CASE-ETC ;

 LEXICON Verbs
ажыра:ажыра V-IV ; ! "seperate,divorce,отделяться,отрываться"
азапта:азапта V-TV ; ! "мучить"
айғайла:айғайла V-IV ; ! "shout,bark at someone"
айқындан:айқындан V-TV-PASS ; ! ""
аймала:аймала V-TV ; ! "embrace"
айрыл:айрыл V-IV ; ! "лишаться,разлучаться"
алақта:алақта V-IV ; ! "look about fearfully,look about in per­plexity"
ал:ал V-TV ; ! "take,recieve,buy,collect,"
алж:алж V-IV ; ! "be in one's dotage"і
алқындыр:алқындыр V-TV ; ! "to complete"
алып% кет:әкет V-TV ; ! "take away" FIXME CHECK
алыста:алыста V-IV ; ! "move off,move away,keep away from"
анықта:анықта V-TV ; ! "elucidate,clarify,define,specify"
апар:апар V-TV ; ! "carry,take to,deliver to/отвезти,отнести,доставить"
аралас:аралас V-IV ; ! "merge,blend/принимать участие,вмешиваться,смешивать"
аршында:аршында V-TV ; ! "to measure in arshines"
арыздас:арыздас V-IV ; ! "to bid good-bye (to a dying person)"
астарла:астарла V-IV ; ! "to line"
асыр:асыр V-TV ; ! "drive off,drive through,overfill"
аула:аула V-TV ; ! "to hunt"
ауыр:ауыр V-IV ; ! "болеет"
аяла:аяла V-TV ; ! "беречь,ласкать,лелеять"
аялда:аялда V-IV ; ! "задерживаться"
әрекеттен:әрекеттен V-IV ; ! "act,endeavor"
әсемде:әсемде V-TV ; ! "decorate,adorn,put in"
бағыс:бағыс V-TV-NOPASS ; ! "educate,look after" (kaz tat) coop
байыт:байыт V-TV ; ! "to enrich" (kaz tat) caus
бақылда:бақылда V-IV ; ! "to bleat"
барлық:барлық V-IV ; ! "запалиться /о лошади/"
баррикадала:баррикадала V-TV ; ! "to barricade"
без:без V-IV ; ! "renounce,disavow"
белбеуле:белбеуле V-TV ; ! "to gird"
бет:бет V-IV ; ! "~end" FIXME CHECK
бойжет:бойжет V-IV ; ! "to grow up"
болдыр:болдыр V-TV ; ! "допускать" (kaz tat) caus
борсаңда:борсаңда V-IV ; ! "to run clumsily"
бүк:бүк V-TV ; ! "to bend"
бүкпеле:бүкпеле V-IV ; ! "to hobble a skittish mare while milking her"
бұрал:бұрал V-IV ; ! "wind"
бұр:бұр V-TV ; ! "turn"
бытыра:бытыра V-IV ; ! "to disperse"
дам:дам V-IV ; ! "develop,grow"
де:де V-TV-NOPASS ; ! "speak"
де:делін V-TV-PASS ; ! "speak"
демде:демде V-TV ; ! "заварить" чәй
елеңде:елеңде V-IV ; ! "to look back fearfully"
ерекшеле:ерекшеле V-TV ; ! ""
есеңгіре:есеңгіре V-IV ; ! "to weaken"
жайластыр:жайластыр V-TV ; ! "to distribute" (kaz tat) caus
жалған:жалған V-IV ; ! "to become tied" (kaz tat) refl
жанастыр:жанастыр V-TV ; ! "" (kaz) caus
жаралан:жаралан V-IV ; ! ""
жәукемде:жәукемде V-TV ; ! "to tear into pieces"
жеткіз:жеткіз V-TV ; ! "to bring to" (kaz tat) caus
жиілен:жиілен V-IV ; ! "to become more frequent"
жой:жой V-TV ; ! ""
жу:жу V-TV ; ! "wash"
жүрексін:жүрексін V-IV ; ! "to be timid"
жырт:жырт V-TV ; ! "tear"
ірілендір:ірілендір V-TV ; ! "to enlarge" (kaz tat) caus
кекір:кекір V-IV ; ! "burp"
көтер:көтер V-TV ; ! "lift"
кристалдан:кристалдан V-IV ; ! "to crystallize"
қабылда:қабылда V-TV-NOPASS ; ! ""
қабылда:қабылдан V-TV-PASS ; ! ""
қабырғалас:қабырғалас V-IV ; ! "to equal"
қаз:қаз V-TV ; ! "dig"
қақа:қақа V-IV ; ! "to rage (of a hard frost)"
қалыптастыр:қалыптастыр V-TV ; ! "" FIXME caus
қантала:қантала V-IV ; ! "to be covered with bruises"
қара:қара V-TV ; ! "look at"
қарқылда:қарқылда V-IV ; ! "to guffaw"
қашырт:қашырт V-TV ; ! "to conceal"
қобалж:қобалж V-IV ; ! "to feel sick"
қорша:қорша V-TV ; ! "to surround"
қорық:қор%{y%}қ V-IV ; ! "to fear" FIXME ы drops out in some forms
құрт:құрт V-TV ; ! ""
қызықсын:қызықсын V-IV ; ! "to get interested in"
қыс:қыс V-TV ; ! "press,squeeze"
мамандан:мамандан V-IV ; ! "specialize"
мәнерле:мәнерле V-TV ; ! "to decorate (with a design)"
нақұрыстан:нақұрыстан V-IV ; ! "to become abnormal"
негізде:негізде V-TV ; ! ""
отыр:отыр V-IV ; ! "sit,board"
өзгеле:өзгеле V-TV ; ! "difference,distinction" (tat) trimm
өрмеле:өрмеле V-IV ; ! "карабкаться"
өтін:өтін V-TV ; ! ""
сағын:сағын V-TV ; ! "miss"
сақтандыр:сақтандыр V-IV ; ! "" caus
сатырла:сатырла V-IV ; ! "to clatter"
сиректендір:сиректендір V-TV ; ! "to thin" (kaz tat) caus
сорақылан:сорақылан V-IV ; ! "to become clumsy"
суар:суар V-TV ; ! "to be given to drink"
сылты:сылты V-IV ; ! "to limp slightly"
сыр:сыр V-TV ; ! "stitch"
тан:тан V-IV ; ! "deny"
таңсықтан:таңсықтан V-TV ; ! "to have a strong desire"
тәркіле:тәркіле V-TV ; ! ""
тереңде:тереңде V-IV ; ! "to get deeper"
тілімде:тілімден V-TV-PASS ; ! ""
тіре:тіре V-TV ; ! "support"
төбелес:төбелес V-IV ; ! "arrange a fight"
түзе:түзе V-TV ; ! "straighten out"
тұрғыз:тұрғыз V-TV ; ! "" caus
тықырла:тықырла V-IV ; ! "to crunch"
уақсын:уақсын V-TV ; ! "to consider something (to be) small"
ұзар:ұзар V-IV ; ! "get longer"
ұрла:ұрла V-TV ; ! "steal"
шанд:шанд V-TV ; ! "to tie (a cord)"
шашаулан:шашаулан V-IV ; ! "to repulse"
шошаңдат:шошаңдат V-TV ; ! "to make frequent short movements with something"
шыда:шыда V-IV ; ! "put up,take it"
ысыл:ысыл V-IV ; ! "to acquire a habit"
ысыр:ысыр V-TV ; ! "to move"
мақұлда:мақұлда V-TV ; ! ""
тақ:тақ V-TV ; ! ""
бақталастыр:бақталастыр V-IV ; ! "" caus?
қинал:қинал V-IV ; ! "" refl
жетекте:жетекте V-TV ; ! ""
жат:жатыр Vinfl-AUX-IMPF ; ! 
жүр:жүр Vinfl-AUX-IMPF ; ! 
отыр:отыр Vinfl-AUX-IMPF ; ! 
тұр:тұр Vinfl-AUX-IMPF ; ! 
ал:ал Vinfl-AUX ; ! 
баста:баста Vinfl-AUX ; !
бер:бер Vinfl-AUX ; !
біт:біт Vinfl-AUX ; !
бітір:бітір Vinfl-AUX ; !
бол:бол Vinfl-AUX ; !
ет:ет Vinfl-AUX ; ! ""
жазда:жазда Vinfl-AUX ; !
жат:жат Vinfl-AUX ; ! 
жүр:жүр Vinfl-AUX ; ! 
кел:кел Vinfl-AUX ; !
кет:кет Vinfl-AUX ; ! 
қал:қал Vinfl-AUX ; ! 
отыр:отыр Vinfl-AUX ; ! 
сал:сал Vinfl-AUX ; ! 
сал%<vaux%>%<ger%>:салыш GER-INFL ; ! Dir/LR
тұр:тұр Vinfl-AUX ; ! 
шық:шық Vinfl-AUX ; !
